New York, session 2025-2026, A8420.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (f) of subdivision 1 of section 250 of the agri- 2 culture and markets law, as amended by chapter 288 of the laws of 1999, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 (f) (i) At any time the fund exceeds [four] six million dollars on the 5 one hundred twentieth day prior to the commencement of the next license 6 year, the commissioner shall suspend collection of the security fund 7 fee, unless [he or she] such commissioner has reason to believe that 8 pending claims may reduce the fund below that amount. 9 (ii) In the event that the fund exceeds six million dollars on the one 10 hundred twentieth day prior to the commencement of the next year, but 11 when adjusted for the rate of inflation, the security fund does not 12 provide the same level of protection to the producers as provided for by 13 subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the commissioner shall continue the 14 collection of security fund fees for such year. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09943-01-5